Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201847-206
Jailer; neglect of duty; penalty.

The officer in charge of any municipal prison or jail who fails to comply with the provisions of sections 47-201 to 47-205 or the rules prescribed by the Jail Standards Board shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1915, c. 208, § 6, p. 463;

C.S.1922, § 3015;

C.S.1929, § 47-120;

R.S.1943, § 47-206;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 269;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 17;

Laws 2018, LB776, § 10.
July 19, 2018